vim/st.aff
FLAG long
SFX iW Y 54
SFX iW uïr uïr/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr yant/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uï/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uïs/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uïe/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uïes/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr is/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr it/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr yons/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr yez/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr ient/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr yais/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr yait/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr yions/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr yiez/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr yaient/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uïs/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uït/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uïmes/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uïtes/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uïrent/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uïrai/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr rrai/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uïras/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr rras/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uïra/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr rra/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uïrons/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr rrons/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uïrez/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr rrez/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uïront/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr rront/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uïrais/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr rrais/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uïrait/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr rrait/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uïrions/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr rrions/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uïriez/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr rriez/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uïraient/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr rraient/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr ie/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr ies/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uïsse/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uïsses/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uït/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uïssions/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uïssiez/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr uïssent/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr is/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr yons/ ouïr
SFX iW uïr yez/ ouïr

SFX iX Y 5
SFX iX érir érir/ férir
SFX iX érir éru/ férir
SFX iX érir érus/ férir
SFX iX érir érue/ férir
SFX iX érir érues/ férir

SFX iY Y 5
SFX iY ssir ssir/ issir
SFX iY ssir ssu/ issir
SFX iY ssir ssus/ issir
SFX iY ssir ssue/ issir
SFX iY ssir ssues/ issir

SFX pA Y 45
SFX pA ouvoir ouvoir/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ouvant/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir u/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir eux/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir uis/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir eut/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ouvons/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ouvez/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir euvent/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ouvais/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ouvait/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ouvions/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ouviez/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ouvaient/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir us/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ut/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ûmes/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ûtes/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir urent/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ourrai/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ourras/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ourra/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ourrons/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ourrez/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ourront/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ourrais/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ourrait/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ourrions/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ourriez/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ourraient/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir uisse/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir uissé/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir uissè/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir uisses/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir uissions/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir uissiez/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir uissent/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir usse/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ussé/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ussè/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir usses/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ût/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ussions/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ussiez/ pouvoir
SFX pA ouvoir ussent/ pouvoir

SFX pB Y 49
SFX pB ouloir ouloir/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oulant/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oulu/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oulus/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oulue/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oulues/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir eux/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir eut/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oulons/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oulez/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir eulent/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oulais/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oulait/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oulions/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir ouliez/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oulaient/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oulus/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oulut/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oulûmes/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oulûtes/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oulurent/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oudrai/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oudras/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oudra/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oudrons/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oudrez/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oudront/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oudrais/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oudrait/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oudrions/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oudriez/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oudraient/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir euille/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir euillé/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir euillè/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir euilles/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir euillent/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oulusse/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oulusses/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oulût/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oulussions/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oulussiez/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oulussent/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir euille/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir eux/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir euillons/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oulons/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir euillez/ vouloir
SFX pB ouloir oulez/ vouloir

SFX pC Y 46
SFX pC evoir evoir/ devoir
SFX pC evoir evant/ devoir
SFX pC evoir û/ redevoir
SFX pC evoir u/ redevoir
SFX pC evoir us/ devoir
SFX pC evoir ue/ devoir
SFX pC evoir ues/ devoir
SFX pC evoir ois/ devoir
SFX pC evoir oit/ devoir
SFX pC evoir evons/ devoir
SFX pC evoir evez/ devoir
SFX pC evoir oivent/ devoir
SFX pC evoir evais/ devoir
SFX pC evoir evait/ devoir
SFX pC evoir evions/ devoir
SFX pC evoir eviez/ devoir
SFX pC evoir evaient/ devoir
SFX pC evoir us/ devoir
SFX pC evoir ut/ devoir
SFX pC evoir ûmes/ devoir
SFX pC evoir ûtes/ devoir
SFX pC evoir urent/ devoir
SFX pC evoir evrai/ devoir
SFX pC evoir evras/ devoir
SFX pC evoir evra/ devoir
SFX pC evoir evrons/ devoir
SFX pC evoir evrez/ devoir
SFX pC evoir evront/ devoir
SFX pC evoir evrais/ devoir
SFX pC evoir evrait/ devoir
SFX pC evoir evrions/ devoir
SFX pC evoir evriez/ devoir
SFX pC evoir evraient/ devoir
SFX pC evoir oive/ devoir
SFX pC evoir oives/ devoir
SFX pC evoir usse/ devoir
SFX pC evoir ussé/ devoir
SFX pC evoir ussè/ devoir
SFX pC evoir usses/ devoir
SFX pC evoir ût/ devoir
SFX pC evoir ussions/ devoir
SFX pC evoir ussiez/ devoir
SFX pC evoir ussent/ devoir
SFX pC evoir ois/ devoir
SFX pC evoir evons/ devoir
SFX pC evoir evez/ devoir

SFX pD Y 1
SFX pD evoir û devoir

SFX pE Y 46
SFX pE avoir avoir/ savoir
SFX pE avoir achant/ savoir
SFX pE avoir u/ savoir
SFX pE avoir us/ savoir
SFX pE avoir ue/ savoir
SFX pE avoir ues/ savoir
SFX pE avoir ais/ savoir
SFX pE avoir ait/ savoir
SFX pE avoir avons/ savoir
SFX pE avoir avez/ savoir
SFX pE avoir avent/ savoir
SFX pE avoir avais/ savoir
SFX pE avoir avait/ savoir
SFX pE avoir avions/ savoir
SFX pE avoir aviez/ savoir
SFX pE avoir avaient/ savoir
SFX pE avoir us/ savoir
SFX pE avoir ut/ savoir
SFX pE avoir ûmes/ savoir
SFX pE avoir ûtes/ savoir
SFX pE avoir urent/ savoir
SFX pE avoir aurai/ savoir
SFX pE avoir auras/ savoir
SFX pE avoir aura/ savoir
SFX pE avoir aurons/ savoir
SFX pE avoir aurez/ savoir
SFX pE avoir auront/ savoir
SFX pE avoir aurais/ savoir
SFX pE avoir aurait/ savoir
SFX pE avoir aurions/ savoir
SFX pE avoir auriez/ savoir
SFX pE avoir auraient/ savoir
SFX pE avoir ache/ savoir
SFX pE avoir aches/ savoir
SFX pE avoir achions/ savoir
SFX pE avoir achiez/ savoir
SFX pE avoir achent/ savoir
SFX pE avoir usse/ savoir
SFX pE avoir usses/ savoir
SFX pE avoir ût/ savoir
SFX pE avoir ussions/ savoir
SFX pE avoir ussiez/ savoir
SFX pE avoir ussent/ savoir
SFX pE avoir ache/ savoir
SFX pE avoir achons/ savoir
SFX pE avoir achez/ savoir
